Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 4. Commissioner of Rehabilitative Services.

§§ 51.5-13 through 51.5-14.1.

Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 60.

Cross references.

For current provisions pertaining to the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, see §

51.5-130

; the powers and duties of the Commissioner, see §

51.5-131

; the promulgation of regulations regarding human research, see §

51.5-132

; and the duty to assist and cooperate with local authorities, see §

51.5-133

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, in enactment clauses 59 through 71, eliminated the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services, transferring powers and duties to the newly created Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. For comparable sections see §

51.5-116

et seq. Where appropriate the historical references and case notes to former provisions have been transferred to the new provisions.